Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1268.03
State investment officer; limitation on deposits.

The state investment officer shall not have on deposit in any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution giving a guaranty bond more than the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation plus the maximum amount of the bond given by such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution or in any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution giving a personal bond more than the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation plus one-half of the amount of the bond given by such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution. All bonds of such depositories shall be deposited with and held by the state investment officer.

Laws 1985, LB 614, § 8;

Laws 1992, LB 757, § 24;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 29;

Laws 2003, LB 175, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 13.
March 6, 2009